Utah statutes.
26-33a-108.   Disclosure of identifiable health data prohibited.
(1)  All information, reports, statements, memoranda, or other data received
by the committee are strictly confidential.  Any use, release, or publication
of the information shall be done in such a way that no person is identifiable
except as provided in Sections 26-33a-107 and 26-33a-109.
(2)  No member of the committee may be held civilly liable by reason of having
released or published reports or compilations of data supplied to the
committee, so long as the publication or release is in accordance with the
requirements of Subsection (1).
(3)  No person, corporation, or entity may be held civilly liable for having
provided data to the committee in accordance with this chapter.
